Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 2. Administration

§ 3313.
Regulation of real estate appraisers; Director; advisor appointees.

Director shall administer the provisions of this chapter.
(a) (1) Director shall administer the provisions of this chapter.

The Secretary of State shall appoint six persons of suitable qualifications in accordance with this section to advise the Director in matters concerning real estate appraisal.
(2) (A) The Secretary of State shall appoint six persons of suitable qualifications in accordance with this section to advise the Director in matters concerning real estate appraisal.

The Secretary shall appoint the advisors for five-year staggered terms. Four of the initial appointments shall be for four-, three-, two-, and one-year terms.

The Director shall consult the appointed advisors prior to exercising interpretive discretion, adopting or amending rules, and determining any substantial regulatory question presented in the course of administering this chapter.

Three advisors shall be real estate appraisers licensed under this chapter who have been actively engaged in the full-time practice of real estate appraising for five years preceding appointment and have been practicing in Vermont for the two-year period immediately preceding appointment.

Two advisors shall be public members who shall have no direct financial interest personally or through a spouse, parent, child, brother, or sister in real estate appraising.

One advisor shall be a public member actively engaged in the business of banking, including lending for the purpose of buying real property, or shall be a person who is a consumer of appraisal services in the regular course of his or her business.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 264

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1991, No. 92

, § 2;

1993, No. 217

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

1999, No. 133

(Adj. Sess.), § 30;

2005, No. 27

, § 95;

2009, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 42;

2019, No. 30

, § 21.

§ 3314.
Director; powers and duties.

The Director shall administer the provisions of this chapter in a manner that conforms in all respects with the requirements of the Act.

In addition to the Director’s other powers and duties under this chapter, the Director shall:

Receive and review applications.

Collect the registry fee as required by the Act and transmit that fee to the ASC. The registry fee shall be in addition to State licensing and registration fees.

Annually publish a roster of all licensees and transmit the roster to the ASC as required by the Act.

Register appraisal management companies.

Make inquiries he or she deems necessary into the character, integrity, and reputation of the applicant.

Perform other functions and duties as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter and to comply with the requirements of the Act, including by adopting rules defining and regulating appraisal management companies in a manner consistent with the Act.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 264

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2009, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 43;

2013, No. 27

, § 38;

2013, No. 138

(Adj. Sess.), § 41;

2017, No. 48

, § 22;

2019, No. 30

, § 21.

§ 3315.
Rules.

The Director may adopt rules necessary to implement the provisions of this chapter.

The Director shall adopt rules relating to procedures for processing applications, issuing licenses, registering trainees, inspecting records, and instituting and conducting disciplinary proceedings.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 264

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1991, No. 92

, § 3;

1993, No. 217

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 4, 5;

2013, No. 27

, § 39;

2019, No. 30

, § 21.